Utah statutes.
62A-2-111.   Adjudicative proceedings.
(1)  Whenever the office has reason to believe that a licensee is in violation
of this chapter or rules made under this chapter, the office may commence
adjudicative proceedings to determine the legal rights of the licensee by
serving notice of agency action in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  A licensee, human services program, or individual may commence
adjudicative proceedings, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4,
Administrative Procedures Act, regarding all office actions that determine the
legal rights, duties, privileges, immunities, or other legal interests of the
licensee, human services program, or persons associated with the licensee,
including all office actions to grant, deny, place conditions on, revoke,
suspend, withdraw, or amend an authority, right, or license under this
chapter.
